trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<pardef n="/iĝi__vbser"> <!-- pp = inta ĉar it-formoj ne ekzistas (same kiel en netransitivaj verboj) -->
  <e>       <p><l>iĝi</l>       <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝas</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝis</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝos</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintajn</l>  <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝonta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝonta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝontaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝante</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinte</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝu</l>       <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝas</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>igi</l>       <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igas</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igis</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igos</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igus</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igintan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igintajn</l>  <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igintan</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igonta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igonta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igontaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igintaj</l>   <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igante</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginte</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igu</l>       <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igas</l>      <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>iĝi<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>




<pardef n="Barcelono__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Barcelon/o__np">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Alp/oj__np">
  <e>       <p><l>oj</l>        <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojn</l>       <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>oj</l>        <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ojn</l>       <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>oj</l>         <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>oj</l>        <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Barcelona__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Sudo-Pirine/oj__np">
  <e>       <p><l>oj</l>        <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojn</l>       <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>oj</l>        <r>oj<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- landonomoj: akceptas -io, -ujo, -lando; generas -io -->
<pardef n="Alban/io__np">
  <e>       <p><l>io</l>        <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ujo</l>       <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lando</l>     <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ion</l>       <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ujon</l>      <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>landon</l>    <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>io</l>        <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ion</l>       <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>io</l>        <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>io</l>        <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Almuniente">      <i>Almuniente</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alpoj">           <i>Alp</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Andoj">           <i>And</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Antiloj">         <i>Antil</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Antverpeno">      <i>Antverpen</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dalmacio">            <i>Dalmat</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bahamoj">         <i>Baham</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hispanioj">       <i>Hispani</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Balearoj">        <i>Balear</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Beas">            <i>Beas</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Beogrado">        <i>Beograd</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Saksio">         <i>Saks</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Butano">          <i>Butan</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Calatayud">       <i>Calatayud</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cellorigo">       <i>Cellorigo</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="EEK">             <i>EEK</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="El Cubillo de Uceda"><i>El<b/>Cubillo<b/>de<b/>Uceda</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="EU">              <i>EU</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Normandio">       <i>Normand</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ferooj">          <i>Fero</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Fiĝioj">          <i>Fiĝi</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Flandrio">        <i>Flandri</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Fuentes de Carbajal"><i>Fuentes<b/>de<b/>Carbajal</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hamburgo">        <i>Hamburg</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Henegovio">       <i>Henegov</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Indioj">          <i>Indi</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Irak">            <i>Irak</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Iruraiz">         <i>Iruraiz</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ĉeĉenio">         <i>Ĉeĉen</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kalkato">         <i>Kalkat</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kebekio">         <i>Kebek</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kolkato">         <i>Kolkat</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Komoroj">         <i>Komor</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Laza">            <i>Laza</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lieĝo">           <i>Lieĝ</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Makedonio">       <i>Makedon</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marŝaloj">        <i>Marŝal</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maŭritanio">      <i>Maŭritani</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Melgar de Yuso">  <i>Melgar<b/>de<b/>Yuso</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nieva">           <i>Nieva</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nikaragvo">       <i>Nikaragv</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Parano">          <i>Paran</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pinedas">         <i>Pinedas</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Plejadoj">        <i>Plejad</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Rocafort de Queralt"><i>Rocafort<b/>de<b/>Queralt</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sanmarino">       <i>Sanmarin</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sejŝeloj">        <i>Sejŝel</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Silezio">         <i>Silez</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sofia">           <i>Sofia</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sud-Afriko">      <i>Sud-Afrik</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tormón">          <i>Tormón</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tunizo">          <i>Tuniz</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Umbrio">          <i>Umbr</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Villarta-Quintana"><i>Villarta-Quintana</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ĉeĥio">           <i>Ĉeĥ</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ĝenevo">          <i>Ĝenev</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Apeninoj">            <i>Apenin</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gaŭlio">            <i>Gaŭl</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Burgundio">            <i>Burgund</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ŝvabio">            <i>Ŝvab</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Amerikoj">            <i>Amerik</i><par n="Alp/oj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ĥaldeio">            <i>Ĥalde</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
